North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Board of Directors.

§ 55-8-01.
Requirement for and duties of board of directors.

Except as provided in subsection (c), each corporation must have a board of directors.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the corporation managed by or under the direction of, its board of directors, except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or in an agreement valid under G.S. 55-7-31(b).

A corporation may dispense with or limit the authority of a board of directors by describing in its articles of incorporation or in an agreement valid under G.S. 55-7-31(b) who will perform some or all of the duties of a board of directors; but no such limitation upon the authority which the board of directors would otherwise have shall be effective against other persons without actual knowledge of such limitation.

To the extent the articles of incorporation or an agreement valid under G.S. 55-7-31(b) vests authority of the board of directors in an individual or group other than the board of directors, such individual or group in the exercise of such authority shall be deemed to be acting as the board of directors for all purposes of this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2005-268, s. 6.

§ 55-8-02.
Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this State or a shareholder of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-03.
Number and election of directors.

A board of directors must consist of one or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, but for a corporation to which G.S. 55-7-28(e) applies in which shares are entitled to be voted cumulatively, the number of directors shall not be decreased unless one of the following applies:

The decrease is approved by the shareholders in a vote in which the number of shares entitled to be voted cumulatively that vote against the proposal for decrease would not be sufficient to elect a director by cumulative voting.

The decrease is made pursuant to a provision of the articles of incorporation or bylaws fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors and authorizing the number of directors to be fixed or changed from time to time, within the maximum and the minimum, by the shareholders or, unless the articles of incorporation or an agreement valid under

G.S. 55-7-31

provides otherwise, the board of directors.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-268, s. 7.

Directors are elected at the first annual shareholders’ meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter unless their terms are staggered under

G.S. 55-8-06

.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 14, 39; Rev., ss. 1147, 1182; C.S., ss. 1144, 1175; 1927, c. 138; G.S., ss. 55-48, 55-112; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 33; 1969, c. 751, ss. 10, 11; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 552, s. 13; 2005-268, s. 7; 2006-264, s. 44(a).

§ 55-8-04.
Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into classes, the articles may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the holders of one or more authorized classes of shares. A class (or classes) of shares entitled to elect one or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 14, 39; Rev., ss. 1147, 1182; C.S., ss. 1144, 1175; 1927, c. 138; G.S., ss. 55-48, 55-112; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 33; 1969, c. 751, ss. 10, 11; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-05.
Terms of directors generally.

The terms of the initial directors of a corporation expire at the first shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

The terms of all other directors expire at the next annual shareholders’ meeting following their election unless their terms are staggered under

G.S. 55-8-06

.

A decrease in the number of directors does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy expires at the next shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, he continues to serve until his successor is elected and qualifies or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 14, 39; Rev., ss. 1147, 1182; C.S., ss. 1144, 1175; 1927, c. 138; G.S., ss. 55-48, 55-112; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 33; 1969, c. 751, ss. 10, 11; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-06.
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws adopted by the shareholders may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into two, three, or four groups, with each group containing one-half, one-third, or one-fourth of the total, as near as may be. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, the terms of the second group expire at the second annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, the terms of the third group, if any, expire at the third annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, and the terms of the fourth group, if any, expire at the fourth annual shareholders’ meeting after their election. At each annual shareholders’ meeting held thereafter, directors shall be chosen for a term of two, three, or four years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 14, 44; Rev., ss. 1147, 1148; C.S., s. 1144; 1937, c. 179; 1945, c. 200; 1949, c. 917; G.S., s. 55-48; 1955, c. 914, s. 1; c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 7; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 552, s. 10; 2005-268, s. 8.

§ 55-8-07.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by communicating his resignation to the board of directors, its chair, or the corporation.

A resignation is effective when it is communicated unless it specifies in writing a later effective date or subsequent event upon which it will become effective.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 34; 1973, c. 469, s. 7; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2001-358, s. 6(c); 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55-8-08.
Removal of directors by shareholders.

The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove him.

If cumulative voting is authorized, unless the entire board of directors is to be removed, a director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect him under cumulative voting is voted against his removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove him exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove him.

A director may not be removed by the shareholders at a meeting unless the notice of the meeting states that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or a bylaw adopted by the shareholders, the entire board of directors may be removed from office with or without cause by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast at any election of directors.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 34; 1973, c. 469, s. 7; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 6.

§ 55-8-09.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The superior court of the county where a corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this State, its registered office) is located may remove a director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by its shareholders holding at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding shares of any class if the court finds that:

The director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct, or gross abuse of authority or discretion, with respect to the corporation; and

Removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

If shareholders commence a proceeding under subsection (a), they shall make the corporation a party defendant.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 34; 1973, c. 469, s. 7; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-10.
Vacancy on board.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including, without limitation, a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors or from the failure by the shareholders to elect the full authorized number of directors:

The shareholders may fill the vacancy;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors, or by the sole director, remaining in office.

If the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the remaining director or directors elected by that voting group or the holders of shares of that voting group are entitled to fill the vacancy.

A vacancy that will occur upon a specific later date or subsequent event (by reason of a resignation effective upon a later date or subsequent event under G.S. 55-8-07(b) or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 34; 1973, c. 469, s. 7; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.12.

§ 55-8-11.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors, without regard to personal interest, may fix the compensation of directors for services in any capacity as a director. The compensation established pursuant to this section of directors of a public corporation or of a corporation that so provides in its articles of incorporation is presumed to be fair to the corporation unless proven not to be fair to the corporation by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 7; 2021-106, s. 2(a).

§§ 55-8-12 through 55-8-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.